{"post-93125": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1567089846000", "message": "The forces of the Bergland, led by Count Elric, are bivouacked at Tauenberg Pass.\u00a0 To the north is the small village of Tauenberg itself, and to the south lies the Badlands.\u00a0 Despite the fact that the area is swarming with greenskins, the roads cutting through the Badlands offer a quick route for traders and travelers alike.\u00a0 Mercenaries find good work protecting those merchants willing to pay for their services.There are some in the Empire who believe a roving band of greenskins ambushed and killed the Emperor.\u00a0 Count Elric remains skeptical, but an offensive against a rumored greenskin uprising would do much to ease unrest, and may even provide answers; it would also serve to garner the Bergland's Elector some credibility and prestige.\u00a0 For this reason the 'crippled' elector count has led his forces to Tauenberg Pass in an attempt to crush any hopes of a united greenskin warband.The purple-laden banners of Augendorf sway in the light breeze.\u00a0 The sun creeps over the eastern peaks of the mountains on its daily journey across the heavens.\u00a0 The otherwise cloudless sky offers no indication of rain or unwanted weather.Count Elric sits atop his black stallion, inspecting a company of knights before him.\u00a0 They are covered in steel plate, crafted by the finest smiths in Augendorf, and wield great zweihanders.\u00a0 Time and time again the Bergland greatswords have acted as shock infantry in the Empire's army, charging with zealous intent and cutting a bloody swathe through the enemy in the name of their Count and their Emperor.\u00a0 While each man owned a mount, the Berglanders were more accustomed to fighting on foot and so their steeds were used primarily for transport.Satisfied with their appearance, Elric congratulated the company's captain and the men were allowed to return to their pitched shelters.\u00a0 The Count had sent letters to his fellow electors and hoped allies would arrive and help crush any probable greenskin insurrection.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The forces of the Bergland, led by Count Elric, are bivouacked at Tauenberg Pass.\u00a0 To the north is the small village of Tauenberg itself, and to the south lies the Badlands.\u00a0 Despite the fact that the area is swarming with greenskins, the roads cutting through the Badlands offer a quick route for traders and travelers alike.\u00a0 Mercenaries find good work protecting those merchants willing to pay for their services."}, "post-93143": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1567139404000", "message": "The men under Lieutenant-Colonel Franz Junger had been marching for days now. The Imperial Army was stretched ever thinner, it's massive size not so impressive given the territory it had to cover and the amounts of combat it had to see, not to speak of the amount of garrissons necessary for the functioning of the Imperium. But, they had to answer Count Elric's call to war. If they were seen to be unable to even respond to the the demands of an Elector to slay a greenskin incursion then they would show weakness and many would suddenly get... Ideas.So they sent a force that was most likely far less than what Elric was expecting but far more than could be afforded. There were a hundred men with billooks, protected by sallet helms, brigandines, plate vambraces and gloves, chainmail legs and sabatons and given a sidearm of a katzbalger blade. With them came fifty Swordsmen, given zweihanders and plate armour from head to belt leaving legs bare to let them charge the enemy faster and a rapier at their hips should they enter fierce close combat with goblins or other unarmoured foes. There were two caeroballistae present with harder horses and armoured crews, and a single twoed ballistae with likewise well protected engineers given falchions as self defence. Sixty crossbowmen were present, their crossbows using a crannequin design to maximize the rate of fire while not sacrificing the power of a crossbow, and each man carried a dagger with buckler lest close combat be forced. They wore full plate over chainmail and a gambeson from head to toe in a addition to a pavise shield on their backs, the unit an Imperial standard intended to flawlessly annhillate any missile infantry that an enemy may present. Finally, a force of a hundred horsemen was present, them bearing a frontal cuirass, an armet helmet, and chainmail Bardin for their horse's head they went into battle bearing an arming Sword, a crossbow and a heavy lance, the combination of arms and armour intended to forge the unit into a jack of all trades force capable of acting as both shock and skirmisher cavalry.\u00a0The force came to Elric's camp in the evening. They were tired, and hungry as their logistical wagons were several nights ago plundered by bandits. But the march had to go on, lest a general decimate the force.\u00a0Just barely walking, Franz made his likewise emaciated men form up for inspection as best as he could awaiting the arrival of the Elector to put the men to respite.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div style=\"text-align:justify;\">The men under Lieutenant-Colonel Franz Junger had been marching for days now. The Imperial Army was stretched ever thinner, it's massive size not so impressive given the territory it had to cover and the amounts of combat it had to see, not to speak of the amount of garrissons necessary for the functioning of the Imperium. But, they had to answer Count Elric's call to war. If they were seen to be unable to even respond to the the demands of an Elector to slay a greenskin incursion then they would show weakness and many would suddenly get... Ideas.</div>"}, "post-93162": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1567429526000", "message": "Shortly after the recent inspection Elric observed the arrival of Franz Junger and his forces.  \"I am pleased at your arrival,\" he  said to the Lieutenant-Colonel, approaching him on horseback.  Were he on foot he may have stumbled and made an embarrassment of himself, for the mere actions of his day had already fatigued him.  \"I am Count Elric of Bergland.  You are the first, and no doubt the only reinforcements we shall receive.\"  Despite this misfortune Elric would not waver, and he would face these greenskins with whatever force he had at his disposal.Noticing the weary state his allies were in, Elric pointed at the road leading north to Tauenburg.  \"I've had convoys moving back and forth delivering supplies.  Your men may rest, and the quartermaster can provide them with food, supplies, and other essentials.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Shortly after the recent inspection Elric observed the arrival of Franz Junger and his forces.  \"I am pleased at your arrival,\" he  said to the Lieutenant-Colonel, approaching him on horseback.  Were he on foot he may have stumbled and made an embarrassment of himself, for the mere actions of his day had already fatigued him.  \"I am Count Elric of Bergland.  You are the first, and no doubt the only reinforcements we shall receive.\"  Despite this misfortune Elric would not waver, and he would face these greenskins with whatever force he had at his disposal."}, "post-93169": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1567460742000", "message": "The Officer nodded gratefully at Elric stating he was pleased the men arrived, falling to one knee. He did his best to make it look as though it was a gesture of humility but in truth it was quite simply starvation and exhaustion striking from two sides. \"It is an honour to serve.\" The old soldier said, hair usually impeccably groomed falling past either ear. He mustered all the strength he could to stand, meeting the gaze of the Elector as he pondered the nature of the reinforcements. \"My apologies Lord. These are all the General gave, but they're good troops. Not veterans as a whole but most have seen combat at least once, and well equipped too.\" It most likely would not be a satisfactory explanation, Franz thought. But it was all he could give to explain why the Regency Council didn't authorize the General to give the Lieutenant Colonel any more men. \"Thank you, m'Lord.\" he said. \"We'll rest and eat, when should we again form ranks for the march? I presume there will be a strategic meeting to discuss how the invaders are to be dealt with?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>The Officer nodded gratefully at Elric stating he was pleased the men arrived, falling to one knee. He did his best to make it look as though it was a gesture of humility but in truth it was quite simply starvation and exhaustion striking from two sides. \"It is an honour to serve.\" The old soldier said, hair usually impeccably groomed falling past either ear. <br/></div>"}, "post-93276": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1568403426000", "message": "\"Aye,\" Elric answered him, \"see to your men if you need to, and meet me in main tent when you are ready.  We plan to march at noon.\"Franz Junger would have some time to tend to his soldiers in the remaining hours of the morning.  Meanwhile, Elric was assisted in getting down from his horse and seated inside his tent, where there gathered captains of his regiments and scouts.  When Franz arrived he would find Elric listening to the most recent reports of his scouts.\"Lieutenant-Colonel!\" Elric greeted the man with eagerness.  \"Please, take a seat.\"  The Count passed along a parchment with a rough-scrabbled map drawn on it - the work of his scouts.  \"There's a defensible bend in the river just south of here; we can reach it in a couple of hours and set up camp there.  I'd wager large gatherings of greenskins are scattered across the wilds south of the river.  They conduct their raids here in the north before retreating across that river, which covers their tracks and allows them to evade any would-be pursuers.\"Our vanguard will certainly face raiders on the march south, so expect minor skirmishes.  It won't be long before our presence reaches the other greenskins... and it is my hope they consolidate and attempt a stand, so we can destroy their army altogether.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Aye,\" Elric answered him, \"see to your men if you need to, and meet me in main tent when you are ready.  We plan to march at noon.\""}, "post-93298": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1568503469000", "message": "\"Thank you, thank you M'Lord I'll be but a moment!\" Franz said, quickly hobbling off to rest with his men. He made sure to make sure they didn't gorge themselves lest they die of over-feeding syndromes and then went to sleep. After his nap Franz was still tired but in contrast to his state a few hours back he was with the strength of a horse.He awoke at the tug of one of his Feldwebels and looking at the sky he understood it was time to go. The fellow splashed his face with water before drinking the rest of the skin and then quickly combed down his hair. With that done he entered Elric's tent with his adjutant and took the offered seat, nodding to the assembled company. Elric began to speak, and Franz pulled out a quill with parchment to take notes upon to make a quick outline of the Count's strategy. \"Simple enough m'Lord, I see no flaws in this plan. I take it you want to bait them into fighting just outside of the encampment where our forces will be most rested and be ready to return for a change of steed, munitions or medicine if needed? Beyond that, my men and I are prepared to go but when we arrive we'll still need a few hours to finish resting given we now haven't had a chance to recover from our hungered journey.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div align=\"justify\">\"Thank you, thank you M'Lord I'll be but a moment!\" Franz said, quickly hobbling off to rest with his men. He made sure to make sure they didn't gorge themselves lest they die of over-feeding syndromes and then went to sleep. After his nap Franz was still tired but in contrast to his state a few hours back he was with the strength of a horse.</div>"}, "post-93301": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1568509285000", "message": "\"In a perfect world,\" the Count replied, \"the greenskins would break upon our ramparts like waves on a rocky coast.  But I do not think we will be so lucky.  The encampment is merely the most defensible position that we know of at this time; once established there we will send out scouts to better understand the terrain and go from there.\"If that was all, the Count would dismiss the little council and began preparations to move out.  There were over three-hundred men in Franz Junger's force, roughly equal to the approximate four-hundred mustered by Elric.There were two-hundred Bergland Knights; these fearsome shock troops wore plate armor and carried zweihanders; each owned a mount, but the steeds were used for transport and as pack animals, for they preferred to fight on foot.  Accompanying them were one-hundred light horsemen, who were mostly used for scouting, communication, and screening; they were armed with gambesons, falchions, kettle helms, and crossbows.  There were fifty Vessian crossbowmen: mercenaries armed with their own assorted arms and armor, but all of them carried crossbows.  Finally, a handful of engineers had been brought to camp by Elric.It would take a short while to disassemble the camp.  In the meantime, Elric received reports from his scouts: a raiding party had been spotted nearby.  There was no way the main force could meet them before they crossed the river, but if a vanguard was sent out...A courier was sent to Franz Junger, and he would be offered the chance to lead the vanguard.  The vanguard could consist of only those troops who had access to mounts, and no infantry - unless transport was found - could come along.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"In a perfect world,\" the Count replied, \"the greenskins would break upon our ramparts like waves on a rocky coast.  But I do not think we will be so lucky.  The encampment is merely the most defensible position that we know of at this time; once established there we will send out scouts to better understand the terrain and go from there.\""}, "post-93328": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1568751265000", "message": "The Lieutenant Colonel laughed at Elric's summation of the situation, nodding in concurrence. \"Very well, Sir. I'll go to prepare the men.\" He said, standing up and brushing himself off before leading his adjutant back to the State Troops. Once more Franz tried to get a little sleep, getting what one could at best call a cat-nap while the soldiers on his command prepared to go off. Again a Feldwebel woke with a tug on his shoulder, handing him a missive from the Elector Count. He read through it, and stood up to prepare. He wasn't going to deny the honour, and he knew that he was most likely given it for a reason anyway. He donned his helmet, raising the visor so he troops could distinguish him. He got together the intermediate horsemen he brought with him and the two caerroballistae, before going to rendezvous with the Elector's horsemen. They were a fairly formidable force altogether, but they would not be able to make any sort of decisive action by themselves. At most, they would be able to quickly run down any warmachines or foot-skirmishers the enemy had. \u00a0 ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>The Lieutenant Colonel laughed at Elric's summation of the situation, nodding in concurrence. \"Very well, Sir. I'll go to prepare the men.\" He said, standing up and brushing himself off before leading his adjutant back to the State Troops. <br/></div>"}, "post-93354": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1568813953000", "message": "Count Elric loaned the Lieutenant-Colonel seventy-five of his light horsemen. When Junger had mustered his men and merged the Bergland Light Horsemen into his own troupe he would be ready to set out. Directly south was a wide open plain where the view was only obstructed by grassy hills. If Junger decided to keep moving south the vanguard would eventually see forests that hindered their view - but this was the course that the main army would be taking in a few hours. Alternatively he might take a more easterly/southeasterly route where the grass and vegetation became greener, and thicker, and where numerous small rivers ran south into the main river. Sparse woodland dotted these riverlands. The other option was a westerly/southwesterly trek where the hills were far more pronounced where they lined the base of the western mountains. Thick forests and narrow passes made the area perfect for ambushes. Would Franz seek raiders in the south?  Or did he think they were more in the east, where the terrain and vegetation could sustain their small bands?  Perhaps the raiders preferred taking the western routes where the forests and mountains could hide their movements...Whatever he decided, scouts would keep in touch with the main body and Elric would shadow his movements a couple of hours behind. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Count Elric loaned the Lieutenant-Colonel seventy-five of his light horsemen. When Junger had mustered his men and merged the Bergland Light Horsemen into his own troupe he would be ready to set out. "}, "post-93406": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1569476951000", "message": "As the State Troops united with the Elector's men, they would form with the slightly more armoured heavy skirmishers of the State troops making an outer perimeter of the column whereas the caerroballistae and light horsemen would be put in the centre in case of ambush. Junger himself rode at the front of the column for the morale of the men, but he made sure he had men at either side to catch any potential arrows. They decided to go the same route as the main army would. True, the enemy would most likely be on the road less traveled but Franz felt it was more important to make sure the infantry would not be run down whilst moving to their future campsite rather than making some sort of daring first assault. The Empire wasn't built on risky moves. Well... perhaps it was, but it was not maintained by them and to have a collapse of Imperial stability in the region because an army was routed whilst traveling from different campsites would most likely earn the Lieutenant-Colonel a beheading. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div align=\"justify\">As the State Troops united with the Elector's men, they would form with the slightly more armoured heavy skirmishers of the State troops making an outer perimeter of the column whereas the caerroballistae and light horsemen would be put in the centre in case of ambush. Junger himself rode at the front of the column for the morale of the men, but he made sure he had men at either side to catch any potential arrows. <br/></div>"}, "post-93407": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1569608922000", "message": "The vanguard led by Junger made good progress southward.  The open grasslands were not populated by men of the Empire so there were no main roads, but the terrain posed no hindrance to the mobile force.  The southern woodlands came into view more and more, and the rolling hills that occupied the plains began to flatten.Many of the men were no doubt keeping an eye on their surroundings, so when a lone figure appeared just over the ridge of a hill southeast, there must have been some change in noise amongst the column.The figure was some ways off, but visible enough that he could be identified.  It was a greenskin alright, riding atop a fierce warg.  The filth got a good sight of Junger's men and turned away to ride out.  He was a scout, perhaps, or even a forager or straggler.  A raiding party may be hiding just on the other side of the hilltop...", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The vanguard led by Junger made good progress southward.  The open grasslands were not populated by men of the Empire so there were no main roads, but the terrain posed no hindrance to the mobile force.  The southern woodlands came into view more and more, and the rolling hills that occupied the plains began to flatten."}, "post-93419": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1569950070000", "message": "The travels of the group were fairly calm for now, and for now no ambush seemed to be awaiting them. The Lieutenant-Colonel lit up a pipe to steady himself, knowing much of his future career. He was a veteran, making his way to his officer's position all the way from his early conscription. Yet over all the years he had not lost his fear. These were not many men, and if the greenskins surrounded them then there was no way they would be able to escape. Even a force half their size unmounted would be sufficient to wipe out this column if positioned properly. Franz raised his visor a little higher to wipe some sweat from his forehead, when his eyes caught a glimpse of what he quickly identified as a foe. Hearing muttering and insults from his men Commander Junger understood something had to be done. He raised his hand and a whistle, ordering three of his heavy skirmishers to ride out over the Hilltop and launch some crossbow bolts into the back of the fleeing beast so it did not relay a message to it's leader. If there was indeed an ambush on the other side, then the death screams of five of his soldiers would be enough to warn him to prepare for battle. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div align=\"justify\">The travels of the group were fairly calm for now, and for now no ambush seemed to be awaiting them. The Lieutenant-Colonel lit up a pipe to steady himself, knowing much of his future career. He was a veteran, making his way to his officer's position all the way from his early conscription. Yet over all the years he had not lost his fear. These were not many men, and if the greenskins surrounded them then there was no way they would be able to escape. Even a force half their size unmounted would be sufficient to wipe out this column if positioned properly. <br/></div>"}, "post-93430": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1570383156000", "message": "Franz' skirmishers reacted without hesitation and propelled themselves forward.  As they crested the ridge of the hill the whole group of them would have a clear shot at the greenskin.  Though the warg was quick, the skirmishers bolts were quicker, lodging themselves in the rider.Unfortunately, the orc had drawn a horn hanging from his side and began to blow into it just prior to being fatally struck.  A weak but definitely audible alarm was sounded, alerting the rest of his vile ilk nearby.  From where the skirmishers were they made out a wooded area, not far away, and in the direction of where the scout was headed.Birds, previously roosting in the canopy, scattered into the air as the woodland began to shake at the cacophony of alarmed greenskins.  Raiding parties were not generally large, and they favored mobility, so Franz could expect a small force of orcs and goblins lacking armor, probably assisted by warg mounts like the scout.There was enough time for the skrimishers to alert Franz, and enough time for the Lieutenant-Colonel to give orders to meet whatever challenge erupted from the forest.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Franz' skirmishers reacted without hesitation and propelled themselves forward.  As they crested the ridge of the hill the whole group of them would have a clear shot at the greenskin.  Though the warg was quick, the skirmishers bolts were quicker, lodging themselves in the rider."}, "post-93457": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1571149933000", "message": "Franz's men didn't die, having done\u00a0 their duty and survived. But they hadn't done their duty as well as he had expected. From his position he was able to hear the horn of the vile beast and while he quickly prayed that it would be a vain last attempt of the greenskin to save itself, it seemed it really did have friends nearby. The flight of birds clearly meant there was more than just a few in the woods. He rode forth to examine the scene, before deciding on his orders. His heavy skirmishers would form a wide line at the hilltop two ranks long so that the approaching greenskins would face several volleys approaching them until close enough for a counter-charge with lances to clean up what was left. They were divided into two widths as well so the caerroballista could be wedged between them to skewer whole lines of the foe, and the light-horsemen were placed on the far right flank of the force. They were placed just below the hill-top out of view of the greenskins as they would approach the heavy skirmishers so that they could perform an unexpected flank from the side with their own withering fire. The men of the Lieutenant Colonel were in formation and so he drew his sword. Now, the wait. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div align=\"justify\">Franz's men didn't die, having done\u00a0 their duty and survived. But they hadn't done their duty as well as he had expected. From his position he was able to hear the horn of the vile beast and while he quickly prayed that it would be a vain last attempt of the greenskin to save itself, it seemed it really did have friends nearby. The flight of birds clearly meant there was more than just a few in the woods. He rode forth to examine the scene, before deciding on his orders. <br/></div>"}, "post-93549": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1572366112000", "message": "What the greenskins lacked in clever planning and strategy they made up for in cunning and brute force.  But the element of surprise was not on their side, and so they resorted to a full-blown charge.  The army tearing out of the forest was largely disorganized, but the massed mess could still pack a considerable punch.But Franz was no fool.  His heavy skirmishers broke up the charge with their volleys, and the greenskins suffered all the worse as they tried to meet them uphill.  The caerroballista ripped through the ocean of green and complemented what the skirmishers had achieved.  The force that the lancers would meet was only a remnant of some lightly armored mounted raiders that had erupted from the forest.  But they were greenskins, and so were stubborn.  All that remained now was butchery.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "What the greenskins lacked in clever planning and strategy they made up for in cunning and brute force.  But the element of surprise was not on their side, and so they resorted to a full-blown charge.  The army tearing out of the forest was largely disorganized, but the massed mess could still pack a considerable punch."}, "post-93668": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1572738930000", "message": "\"First rank fire! Second rank fire! Reload! All ranks fire! Charge!\" The foe clearly lost momentum with the volleys, the first two delayed between ranks so that the same bolt wouldn't hit the same enemy to insure maximum casualties while the third was made with only both ranks having reloaded to insure as much of an instant shock to the enemy as possible. Franz didn't risk a fourth volley lest the enemy catch the men with their pants down and so they instead went on a counter charge. The enemy was clearly not prepared for this, and even less prepared when Franz blew a whistle to have the light horsemen emerge from the side to catch those the initial charge didn't manage to get. As the enemy was cleared up the Lieutenant-Colonel searched side to side for any greenskin trying to escape the melee and he would bark a random order to distract the soldier trying to kill them. With the main force done he would ride over to the most Senior ranking of the light horsemen, and ask him to send a few men in pursuit of the fleeing greenskins. They were only to fire if their chase went on too long (they were to use their professional judgement for that) or if it looked like they were approaching some sort of camp the greenskin could relay its information to. They were then to carefully remember the path the vile creature took so it could be retraced and with some hope a party by night's darkness could inflict much havoc upon them. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>\"First rank fire! Second rank fire! Reload! All ranks fire! Charge!\" The foe clearly lost momentum with the volleys, the first two delayed between ranks so that the same bolt wouldn't hit the same enemy to insure maximum casualties while the third was made with only both ranks having reloaded to insure as much of an instant shock to the enemy as possible. Franz didn't risk a fourth volley lest the enemy catch the men with their pants down and so they instead went on a counter charge. <br/></div>"}, "post-93840": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1574167215000", "message": "A makeshift greenskin camp did reside in the forest.  If anyone had searched it they might find captives collected during the greenskin raid, but aside from that nothing of importance.  Any sentries who may have been standing guard had already scurried away after the small raiding party was ridden over outside the forest.  Similarly, those greenskins who did manage to flee were ridden down or impaled by crossbow bolts.The engagement was short and successful.  It was a by-the-book vanguard action that cleared the way for the main force, and ensured Franz Junger was heading in the right direction.  The captives were escorted back towards the previous encampment, and than to civilization.A couple of hours passed before Elric and the main body arrived, and after a short conversation the re-combined party advanced further towards the river.Elric's intended destination came into view another couple of hours later.  The winding river cut east to west, and at one point cut sharply southward before bending back north and continuing west.  It was within this bend that the Allies would make their camp, for it was surrounded by a natural moat on three sides.Elric gave orders to the men to begin constructing stockades, and ordered his cavalry to find a spots on the river that were shallow enough to allow a crossing.  Scouts were also sent out to investigate the surrounding area and probe for the main greenskin army.\"Franz,\" Elric approached the Lieutenant-Colonel on horseback once he was finished issuing orders.  \"I want to thank you again for your vanguard action,\" he would say.  \"Has it been long since your last engagement?\"  The Count was clearly interested in the man's previous exploits concerning warfare.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A makeshift greenskin camp did reside in the forest.  If anyone had searched it they might find captives collected during the greenskin raid, but aside from that nothing of importance.  Any sentries who may have been standing guard had already scurried away after the small raiding party was ridden over outside the forest.  Similarly, those greenskins who did manage to flee were ridden down or impaled by crossbow bolts."}, "post-93861": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1574559581000", "message": "Imperial steel had won the day, the men Franz sent out returning with intelligence and kills to their name for which he could only utter thanks to the father above. He took stock of the casualties, making sure none of the fallen were left behind and that their equipment would be returned to their quartermasters to serve another soldier. For now Franz ordered his men to rest, knowing they deserved it for the spectacular performance of moments ago. He himself caught a little more sleep, the wind on the grass lulling him to sleep just as mother's singing. He was prodded awake when it seemed Elric was coming forth, and the Lieutenant-Colonel arose to order his men into formation. For himself, the man took off his helmet and splashed some water on his head to clean it up, making himself presentable for the elector. Once the monarch's force had properly arrive Franz ordered the men he was given command of to help the other in setting up the camp given they had just rested, as opposed to the newcomers. Franz was told by his adjutant that the Elector was approaching, which made a cold drop of sweat roll down his back. But as he was only thanked for his work he relaxed, his very posture changing. \"It's my duty to serve, Lord.\" he replied. But as he asked his question Franz again became ever so slightly uneasy.\u00a0 \"Well, your Majesty, it depends on what you mean I suppose. I helped put down the Joachimite rebellion but four weeks ago come a day.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div align=\"justify\">Imperial steel had won the day, the men Franz sent out returning with intelligence and kills to their name for which he could only utter thanks to the father above. He took stock of the casualties, making sure none of the fallen were left behind and that their equipment would be returned to their quartermasters to serve another soldier. For now Franz ordered his men to rest, knowing they deserved it for the spectacular performance of moments ago. He himself caught a little more sleep, the wind on the grass lulling him to sleep just as mother's singing. <br/></div>"}, "post-94015": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1575559328000", "message": "\"We can forego the formalities,\" Elric assured Franz.  He did respect the man's attention to discipline and applauded his conduct nevertheless.  \"We share this command and are equals, as far as I am concerned.\"  The Joachimite rebellion?  Elric himself had been busy in the Bergland, caught up in political machinations and fighting opposition to his current expedition, and knew little of the rebellion.Elric gave orders to his lieutenants to have the men fall in line and proceed marching to the predetermined destination at the river's bend.  \"Come, Franz,\" he said, \"we'll ride at the front and you can tell me more about it.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"We can forego the formalities,\" Elric assured Franz.  He did respect the man's attention to discipline and applauded his conduct nevertheless.  \"We share this command and are equals, as far as I am concerned.\"  The Joachimite rebellion?  Elric himself had been busy in the Bergland, caught up in political machinations and fighting opposition to his current expedition, and knew little of the rebellion."}, "post-94023": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1575590630000", "message": "\"Of course, Sir.\" Franz said. He welcomed camaraderie, but he was usually skeptical when it was offered by superiors. Usually they only gave it so far as they were in a cheery mood, the moment it came to dining in the same mess hall or something of the sort they forgot about it instantaneously. The commander supposed he'd have to see how it all went.Franz gave his adjutant an order to get his men to prepare for the march, before getting on his horse's saddle. He was still very weary but much better than mere hours ago. The success of the recent skirmish had calmed his nerves and he hoped that it was just the beginning of a trend. \"Well, what in particular would you like to know Sir? I... I'm not the best storyteller, I'm sorry. In summary there was a Mayor in a small village, Helgenstatt. His name was Joachim and hence the rebellion was called Joachimite. He believed the town was neglected by the Empire, and so was the region as a whole. He got some Priests and a few Barons on his side, and though it was a small area in a flat terrain perfectly suited for Imperial armour to crush the revolt the place was surrounded by locales treacherous: swamps, mountains, and ravines. Getting an army in there was nigh impossible and keeping it supplies much harder. Controlling units was harder and harder, men took to looting to feed themselves, which made the population more resentful and less willing to help, making more men turn to looting making more resentment, so on and so forth. The leadership of the rebellion went into hiding, and while this brought us much pain it eventually aided us as one of the wealthiest and most powerful barons of the rebellion got sick in a forest he took refuge in from our troops. With nobody to help him properly he passed away, and from there the tide turned.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>\"Of course, Sir.\" Franz said. He welcomed camaraderie, but he was usually skeptical when it was offered by superiors. Usually they only gave it so far as they were in a cheery mood, the moment it came to dining in the same mess hall or something of the sort they forgot about it instantaneously. The commander supposed he'd have to see how it all went.</div>"}, "post-94043": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1575637546000", "message": "\"Mhm,\" Elric listened.  \"How unfortunate.\"  In a sense, Elric could sympathize with Joachim's plight.  The Empire was a large conglomerate and it was simply too large for even the Emperor to see to all of its matters.  The governance that trickled down rarely reached every crevice.\"My father,\" he began, \"like his forefathers, was constantly plagued by the mountain-men who still reside within the Bergland.  But unlike his predecessors... he took the fight to those primitive bandits.  He had hired witch-hunters from across the Empire to track their whereabouts, and once he discovered enough cave entrances he ordered a mass extermination, giving orders to invade the rats' holes simultaneously.  Men, women... children.\"  The Count shrugged.  \"Butcher's work... but we have had peace for it ever since.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Mhm,\" Elric listened.  \"How unfortunate.\"  In a sense, Elric could sympathize with Joachim's plight.  The Empire was a large conglomerate and it was simply too large for even the Emperor to see to all of its matters.  The governance that trickled down rarely reached every crevice."}, "post-94056": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1575752655000", "message": "Franz chuckled humourlessly. \"Unfortunate, yes. An understatement I think, but true.\" Franz was high enough in command he rarely for himself saw the guts and blood of war but the thought of all the deaths happening because of him often kept him up at night; often, these times at night were with a paranoid hand on the hilt of a blade.Then the Elector told a story about his father, which he really wasn't sure to feel about. First and foremost he considered it from the third person, wondering why it was told. Was the Elector simply trying to relate something similar? Or was he watching for a reaction, judging the slightest movement in response from the Lieutenant-Colonel? Junger was no general but he was still an officer, and as such his job was just as political as it was martial despite his internal protests at this fact. \"He did his duty to his people.\" the commander said eventually. \"A terrible thing, the death of the innocent. But as steward of his people I suppose he had no other choice, just as the Shepherd will shoot a wolf marauding and a wolf benign alike. It would have been hard to do, but I suppose in the end it must have been for the best.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>Franz chuckled humourlessly. \"Unfortunate, yes. An understatement I think, but true.\" Franz was high enough in command he rarely for himself saw the guts and blood of war but the thought of all the deaths happening because of him often kept him up at night; often, these times at night were with a paranoid hand on the hilt of a blade.</div>"}, "post-94058": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1575762451000", "message": "Camaraderie was strong between the members of specific companies, battalions, and regiments.  Soldiers levied in a region were often assigned to the same unit, and most of the men knew each other prior to conscription.  This system was a double-edged sword: on one hand it helped promote the aforementioned camaraderie and encouraged the men to fight harder; alternatively, whole villages and towns would lose the bulk of their male population if a unit was wiped out.Like other imperials, Elric was a firm believer in strict discipline and training, but he also recognized the importance of brotherhood and the effect it had on morale.  This was the basis for his intentions regarding the questions and comments directed at Franz.  The Count believed a good relationship between a commander and his subordinates was crucial to success.  And not just on the field, but politically as well.  As far as Elric was concerned, Franz should be his friend and countryman first, and his subordinate second.Before too long scouts reported that the river's bend was just up ahead.  The sun had passed its zenith hours before, and now teased the horizon in the west.  They had but a few hours to quickly set up a sufficient defense before settling in for the night.The river cut through the area east-to-west, but at the destination, which was elevated into a minor hill, it cut south and made a bend before resuming its flow.  The result was a defensible high ground surrounded by water on three sides.  The hill, as well as the banks of the river, and the perimeter for some distance, was mostly grassy shrubland, so two armies could see each other well before being in range of even siege equipment.This location was considered deep within greenskin territory, and there was no doubt goblin riders had warned their larger cousins of the imperial army.  But that's what Elric was hoping.  The greenskins would not pass up an opportunity to destroy their army.  And the Count would make his stand here - at the most defensible location he could find.\"Report to your companies,\" Elric commanded, \"I want barriers along the banks of the river, ditches to our rear.\"  The lieutenants and other officers did not hesitate riding back to their respective companies and filing forward to a spot around the hill to begin their work.  They would try to work quickly so they could pitch tents and light fires tonight.  \"Don't forget to send out scouts,\" Elric finished.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Camaraderie was strong between the members of specific companies, battalions, and regiments.  Soldiers levied in a region were often assigned to the same unit, and most of the men knew each other prior to conscription.  This system was a double-edged sword: on one hand it helped promote the aforementioned camaraderie and encouraged the men to fight harder; alternatively, whole villages and towns would lose the bulk of their male population if a unit was wiped out."}, "post-94068": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1575872380000", "message": "As Franz made his way to Elric's encampment, the nature of Berglander conscription became apparent fairly quickly. All the different units had their own slight variations of accent, slang and general mannerism and so it was clear they were all from the same places. Franz couldn't say he approved, there were far more good arguments in favour of randomized unit formation than regional selection. But then again it could all be bias. Franz rose up the ranks himself that way and all the men under his command were from different parts of the Empire. Egyszers, Swavians, Romulburgers, Easterlings, Augustgraders, Portainnites, Westerlings, Theodosians, Bayernites \u2014 all the different colourful ethnicities and cultures of Vessia were in his unit, no regional sympathies to make men forget their duty, no mass desertions, and a variety of experiences to exchange. He could not imagine a different formation for himself, he'd likely retire if such a massive change was instituted. The men made it to their chosen site of encampment, and again they unpacked before settling down. The enemy would have no difficulty encircling them here if they had a good commander, but on the other hand if Franz ever had to be encircled then this was the place he'd want to face such a fate... if he didn't have a castle to choose. Franz approached the Elector, and bowed momentarily before speaking. With the earlier words of the Elector he assumed he had permission to speak now and needn't ask, so he went right ahead. \"What would you ask of me lord? My engineers are most specialized in just working with their ballista, but they're engineers nevertheless. I suggest we dig trenches for our crossbowmen, and small craters for the artillery pieces. Place the frontline troops behind the crossbowmen, leave the crossbows as bait and then counter-charge downhill. It's simply but I believe it should work, the greenskins don't tend to be master strategists. Alternatively, we may simply dig two sets of trenches. One lower one for the frontline troops with stakes placed in them, and a higher one for our crossbowmen. We won't have the luxury of a downwards countercharge and the men will be somewhat tired from the digging but it will mean that the enemies fighting our melee troops will continue to have crossbow bolts rain upon them from over the heads of our men. Have them hold the line as the anvil while from behind the crossbowmen are the hammer. If you have any other stratagems I am all ears my lord.\" There were many things that could be suggested, but Franz desperately wanted to go with the safer options. He was a cautious man, and he did not want to be the one responsible for the death of an elector because of a daring move; the death of Elric was in practice the death of Franz as well. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>As Franz made his way to Elric's encampment, the nature of Berglander conscription became apparent fairly quickly. All the different units had their own slight variations of accent, slang and general mannerism and so it was clear they were all from the same places. Franz couldn't say he approved, there were far more good arguments in favour of randomized unit formation than regional selection. But then again it could all be bias. Franz rose up the ranks himself that way and all the men under his command were from different parts of the Empire. Egyszers, Swavians, Romulburgers, Easterlings, Augustgraders, Portainnites, Westerlings, Theodosians, Bayernites \u2014 all the different colourful ethnicities and cultures of Vessia were in his unit, no regional sympathies to make men forget their duty, no mass desertions, and a variety of experiences to exchange. He could not imagine a different formation for himself, he'd likely retire if such a massive change was instituted. <br/></div>"}, "post-94069": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1575900653000", "message": "Were it not for Elric's condition he would have helped his compatriots prepare the defenses.  And so he resorted to cantering around the hill to ensure all was well.  Franz Junger approached him and the Count offered a smile \"ah, Franz, my friend!\" he greeted him, then listened to what he had to say.\"Craters or bastions for the ballista,\" he responded.  \"Artillery has little value in the rugged mountainscape of the Bergland, and so that concept of war escapes me.  Do with your engineers as you please, and it will satisfy all parties.\"This battle would be the first major engagement for Elric.  He was new to warfare, and the only experience he could boast was what he had read in his books.  Someone like Franz, or any of his lieutenants for that matter, were no doubt far more experienced.  It was a perfect opportunity to prove himself... provided they were not all overrun and slaughtered to a man.An encirclement was almost guaranteed, and this is why the Count had ordered ditches dug in the rear.  The Count also believed the greenskins would attack in full force, committing most, if not all of their forces in the first phase of the battle.  They relied on strength in numbers, except for the more clever chieftains among them.\"I am in agreement,\" he continued, \"of using the crossbows as bait.  The river and barriers will serve to disrupt the enemy advance and slow them down, and stem their advantage in numbers.  Once some of them have crossed the river and barriers, however, our own infantry should charge.  The crossbows may loose their bolts overhead from the high ground.\"In addition, my scouts are searching for potential shallows up and down the river.  Where we can cross, I will station a contingent of cavalrymen.  The river will serve to split the greenskin army in two, and while a melee ensues on our side, the cavalry will cross the shallows and charge the enemy on their side.\"Looking towards Franz with a friendly gesture he would ask \"I hope this is sufficient, but I am all ears for what more you have to say.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Were it not for Elric's condition he would have helped his compatriots prepare the defenses.  And so he resorted to cantering around the hill to ensure all was well.  Franz Junger approached him and the Count offered a smile \"ah, Franz, my friend!\" he greeted him, then listened to what he had to say."}, "post-94153": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1576043284000", "message": "En-route to this battlefield was the first time Franz had been to Bergland, but it made sense that the Count would not know much of heavy artillery pieces. The commander reckoned that this place would provide some excellent Alpenjagers for the many wars the Empire would face, but not much else. Likewise he imagined Berglander troops wouldn't be good for much beyond an occasional crusade to some mountains, and any conflict they fought would be purely defensive, or in reclamation of land other states took from them in the past. More worrying though was that in the addition of the rumoured sickliness of Elric, he seemed to be fairly inexperienced. It would make sense, given that if Franz remembered right the man's father had passed recently. The fact that command might all be effectively in the hands of Franz gave the Lieutenant-Colonel much stress. But, there at least seemed to be enough troops to deal with the Greenskins. He might have to make... well, he might have to send a few more lives to the grave than necessary but if it meant Elric survived then it was ultimately worth it. In the back of his mind Franz simply hoped Elric would get himself a son and pass on the mantle of rule once the boy got his first facial hairs. Realizing that he was standing and staring for the last little while, the officer spoke up. \"Excellent Sir. I shall relay the orders to my men.\" With that, he went off to inform his men of what they were to do before grabbing a shovel to help them. He knew Elric couldn't, but he supposed if he could then he'd best fill in for the man. Franz simply hoped nobody noticed him leaning on his shovel every so often with eyes closed and a snore coming from him, exhaustion from the march and combat still all through him. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>En-route to this battlefield was the first time Franz had been to Bergland, but it made sense that the Count would not know much of heavy artillery pieces. The commander reckoned that this place would provide some excellent Alpenjagers for the many wars the Empire would face, but not much else. Likewise he imagined Berglander troops wouldn't be good for much beyond an occasional crusade to some mountains, and any conflict they fought would be purely defensive, or in reclamation of land other states took from them in the past. <br/></div>"}, "post-94164": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1576074924000", "message": "The men worked for quite some time until the sun had finally found its resting place beneath the horizon.  Now the moon cast its pale light across the world.  Barriers had been built, ditches dug, tents pitched, and the river scouted.  Up the river, to the east, was a shallow enough crossing that would allow the horsemen to safely cross.  Sentries observed the surroundings and spied for any movement - as the prospect of a midnight attack was possible.  But most of the men were finding much-needed respite beneath their tents, or around the campfires which had been built along the hill.  Elric did not encourage drinking and the men were explicitly told to forego alcohol, but that didn't stop some of them from smuggling bottles of it on the expedition.  Needless to say, there were several bands of soldiers carousing around in their drunkenness, to some of the officers' displeasure.Now, as was the case in most wars, there was only the waiting.Elric was busy writing reports of the day and also letters which he sent back to not only the Berglander court, but the imperial court as well.  It was his intention to let the Empire and all of her constituents know what he and Franz were doing.  It would quell greenskin uprisings in these parts for a while, but also earn prestige for the officers involved, and lastly help ease the minds of the commoners.  But almost immediately after finishing his transcriptions for the night he fell into a deep slumber.Elric was woken in the early morning hours the next day.  The sun pulled itself over the eastern forest, casting its light on the hill and the coming site of battle.  \"Count!\" one of his aides urged him awake, \"the greenskin force has arrived!\"Elric shook off the sleep that still held a grip on him and forced himself up, staggering over to the flaps of his tent and exiting.  The soldiers were preparing for battle, having equipped themselves with their arms and armor and were lining up in their positions along the base of the hill.  \"Fetch my horse,\" he ordered his aide.  In the distance was a gathering of dark green creatures - the orcs, greenskins, goblins, and other foul beasts.  It was hard to see them from this distance, and given they had not yet attacked Elric presumed they were awaiting further reinforcements.His steed was brought over and it took the aide and the help of two Berglander Knights to help him up.  They also handed him his personal zweihander: a modified equivalent of the usual Berglander weapon, only shorter and thus lighter.  He never intended to be in the thick of the fighting himself, but when his soldiers saw him wielding their native weapon it inspired them.Elric came upon the top of the hill, mounted on his steed alongside his aides.  Down below the crossbowmen and handful of infantry were taking up their positions midway along the hill.  The greenskins would have to cross the river and come at them uphill, although the Count's strategy leaned on the fact that the infantry would charge almost as soon as the enemy crossed the river, and hold them there.Behind him, where ditches were built at the rear of the hill, the last of the cavalry crossed the engineer's bridge.  Once all of the mounted warriors were across the bridge was removed and the horsemen proceeded upriver, hidden by the trees, towards the shallows where they would await Elric's order to charge the flanks.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The men worked for quite some time until the sun had finally found its resting place beneath the horizon.  Now the moon cast its pale light across the world.  Barriers had been built, ditches dug, tents pitched, and the river scouted.  Up the river, to the east, was a shallow enough crossing that would allow the horsemen to safely cross.  Sentries observed the surroundings and spied for any movement - as the prospect of a midnight attack was possible.  But most of the men were finding much-needed respite beneath their tents, or around the campfires which had been built along the hill.  Elric did not encourage drinking and the men were explicitly told to forego alcohol, but that didn't stop some of them from smuggling bottles of it on the expedition.  Needless to say, there were several bands of soldiers carousing around in their drunkenness, to some of the officers' displeasure."}, "post-94294": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1576466550000", "message": "Franz did his best to help but ultimately he was doing more striking heroic poses than real digging. Still, it kept the men lively and got the job done, which was all that really mattered. Finished with the job he let himself have a quick prayer and a meagre meal, before sharpening and oiling his blade. With that done he collapsed on the grass into a very happy slumber. Franz had to be kicked awake by his Adjutant, shooting upright with his hand flying to the man's throat. The man managed to gurgle something about the arrived enemy, and having come to his sense Franz realized what was happening. He splashed half his waterskin's contents onto his face before drinking the other half. He was informed that Elric went mounted and was apparently going to lead the horse troops, so Franz ordered all his mounted men to follow the Elector. Thus, the Lieutenant-Colonel was left with the infantry. \"Form ranks!\" he bellowed, getting all men into position. The Crossbowmen were to be at the front, given orders to not deploy their pavise shields but rather keep them on their backs for a swift and orderly retreat to the safety of the other infantry if needed. Not far away were to be the billhooks, they were to form a quasi testudo with their polearms which wouldn't build the momentum needed for a devastating charge but would allow them to remain in combat for a long time. Finally, the swordsmen with their great two handed blades were to be at the side to charge deep into the enemy before switching to their rapiers and daggers for vicious close combat too tight for a weapon demanding both arms. With his men just how he wanted them, Franz gave the order to move. The Imperial Reichsadler soared high, and it flew on the waves of marching songs. Mouth, drum, flute, trumpet and more kept men in line and with high spirits. Franz walked ahead of them, albeit with his visor wholly lowered to make sure no stray arrows got to him. He really, really hoped there weren't going to be too many greenskins. The hope was most likely forlorn. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Franz did his best to help but ultimately he was doing more striking heroic poses than real digging. Still, it kept the men lively and got the job done, which was all that really mattered. Finished with the job he let himself have a quick prayer and a meagre meal, before sharpening and oiling his blade. With that done he collapsed on the grass into a very happy slumber. "}, "post-94310": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1576683142000", "message": "Elric spotted Franz preparing the troops for battle and was pleased.  He nodded towards the Lieutenant-Colonel in approval whenever the man looked his way.The enemy was amassed some distance across the river.  They appeared as a sea of green; their impetuousness got the better of them and some of them shifted forwards only to be reared back by their warchief - the movements giving the impression of waves rolling back and forth across the shore.  The warchief himself rode atop a large warg; he was a massive orc - which implied him age, experience, and strength.  He would be hard to take down.  Fortunately, his underlings were nothing special.  If Elric had to guess, this was just a gathering of 'recruits' whose training exercises consisted of raiding the Imperials.The enemy did not advance for a time; Elric was content to stay where he was.  He wondered if perhaps another force was elsewhere, maybe trying to flank him, and the army to his front would advance on some predetermined signal.  But the only way across the river was where he had sent the cavalry, and should they see the enemy trying to cross there he would learn of it from the scouts.But the waiting and guessing came to an abrupt end when the greenskins hauled something out of the trees.  It was a war machine... a great, hulking catapult.  Teams of orcs were pulling it by rope through the army, like a ship sailing through the metaphorical sea of green.  Their compatriots roared loudly at the sight of it.\"...great,\" Elric thought.The catapult was loaded with a multitude of stones and at the warchief's order was let loose.  The payload missed its mark, thundering into the river nearby.  But the orcs adjusted and were preparing another salvo, inching the war machine closer, and bringing the impetuous army with it.  The ballista might be able to return fire on Franz's orders.  Even so, the Imperials felt like idle targets, and despite their arms, armor, discipline, and courage... some of them began to lose their nerve.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Elric spotted Franz preparing the troops for battle and was pleased.  He nodded towards the Lieutenant-Colonel in approval whenever the man looked his way."}, "post-94365": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1577315618000", "message": "Marching towards the Orcs Franz thought that - just momentarily - he locked gazes with the Elector who offered him a nod. The Lieutenant Colonel could do naught but offer a salute, regardless of whether or not Elric would even end up seeing it. The usual rowdiness of the greenskin race seemed to be counteracted by the overwhelming potency of their leader. Franz imagine that he would be the real issue in this battle, the greenskins unlike men would never falter so long as their leader stood and by the looks of that brute, the commander imagined that it would be a very long time. With luck, a concentration of crossbow fire and possibly a ballista bolt would bring him down early. By the looks of it, he'd ram through most formations as a one man army, although the many hooks of the billhookmen would come in useful here with some men restraining the beast whilst others put it down. It was little time before he noticed how others were unnerved by the beast, and thus the Officer ordered a new battle-chant to begin to renew morale.Ach, Liebste lass mich halten,Noch einmal deine Hand.Rastlos werde ich reiten,Durch Fluch und Land.Wie will ich verzagen,Ist der Weg auch noch so weit?Stets im Herze tragen unsere letzte Nacht,Zu zweit!Seit an Seit, Seit an Seit, Komm wir reiten in den Wind,Wenn ein neuer Tag beginnt,Ja dann warten HeldentatenFrohen Herzens, frischen Sinn.It worked, or at least temporarily. Their spirits were steeled against the orc leader, but not against the stone thrower that promptly followed. Instantly their bravery dropped, were they simply wait to be turned to wet red puddles? Heads turned this way and that, and Franz had to act. \"Cowards will be shot!\" he announced, drawing a hand crossbow and throwing off his helmet to demonstrate he meant it when he said he'd kill any who flee without orders. But the instincts of the men were right, and while he did whistle for the ballistae to aim at the catapult and it's crew, he knew it would be long before they managed to get direct hits grand enough to actually bring it down. No, Franz had to take a gambit. \"About turn, march!\" he ordered. The men were told to take an orderly retreat. They weren't to run, but they were to stay on the move, to make sure that the catapult had to keep moving to stay in their range and even when it did get in range the Imperial troops would no longer be in a position they had adjusted their aim for. But just as importantly, this would mean that the greenskins hoping to chase after the humans that left their backs exposed would run forth eagerly, and perhaps even the more disciplined Orc leading them would greedily give chase in thirst for blood. This would disorganize the foe, and expose their rears hopefully giving the mounted troops an opening to swoop in and eliminate the catapult and thrust into green skinned flanks. Franz only hoped Elric would act fast for Franz was giving up the vital chokepoints that the whole Imperial strategy was reliant upon previously.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>Marching towards the Orcs Franz thought that - just momentarily - he locked gazes with the Elector who offered him a nod. The Lieutenant Colonel could do naught but offer a salute, regardless of whether or not Elric would even end up seeing it. The usual rowdiness of the greenskin race seemed to be counteracted by the overwhelming potency of their leader. Franz imagine that he would be the real issue in this battle, the greenskins unlike men would never falter so long as their leader stood and by the looks of that brute, the commander imagined that it would be a very long time. With luck, a concentration of crossbow fire and possibly a ballista bolt would bring him down early. By the looks of it, he'd ram through most formations as a one man army, although the many hooks of the billhookmen would come in useful here with some men restraining the beast whilst others put it down. It was little time before he noticed how others were unnerved by the beast, and thus the Officer ordered a new battle-chant to begin to renew morale.<br/></div>"}, "post-94393": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1577550611000", "message": "The rock-thrower could very well have brought disorder to the Imperial ranks, but disaster was diverted thanks to Franz.  The men steeled themselves in the presence of their superior and acted accordingly to his orders.  The rickety catapult released another payload and crashed into positions formerly occupied by the Vessians, although the recent maneuvers ensured no one was injured.  The ballistae brought along by the Lieutenant returned fire and if they missed on their first volley then the calculations for their second would prove accurate and disable the siege engine.The greenskin warchief hoped to demoralize and thin the ranks of the defenders with the weapon.  The plan almost worked, but at least the Imperials had given ground.  A guttural roar came from his throat as he held his mighty axe high in the air: a signal to charge.  The great green sea poured forth like a river flooding through a broken dam.The zealous orcs wore little to no armor at all; some of them wielded makeshift shields, but most carried large two-handed weapons.  What they lacked in protection they made up for in numerical superiority and ferocity.  They would be at the crossing soon and the Imperials would have to act.  The warchief was easily identifiable atop his warg, but his size alone made him stand out among his underlings; he had joined the charge at the rear of the warband - no doubt intending to see where his charge was weakest and joining the fray there.One of Elric's aides galloped alongside Franz: \"The Count has requested you hold this position at all costs,\" he hollered over the cacophony of war-chants and battle-cries.  \"The general has ridden off to join the cavalry and will arrive to assist you soon!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The rock-thrower could very well have brought disorder to the Imperial ranks, but disaster was diverted thanks to Franz.  The men steeled themselves in the presence of their superior and acted accordingly to his orders.  The rickety catapult released another payload and crashed into positions formerly occupied by the Vessians, although the recent maneuvers ensured no one was injured.  The ballistae brought along by the Lieutenant returned fire and if they missed on their first volley then the calculations for their second would prove accurate and disable the siege engine."}, "post-94447": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1577949510000", "message": "\"Move! Move! Move!\" Franz hurried his men along, knowing that while order was important, he had to get everyone out of the way of body splattering rocks. He thanked the father above for having narrowly escaped many deaths, but he knew he couldn't relax just yet. He had for the sake of escaping stones given up a perfect position, and now he and his men weren't sitting ducks for artillery, instead now becoming prey for greenskin hunting. Now that he came to think of it, at least getting hit by a rock was an instant death. Maybe he had made a mistake going here? Brought out of his momentary daydream Franz looked to the rider sent by Elric, and nodded in response. \"Tell his Majesty that his wish is my command!\" he called out, saluting the man as he went back to the Elector. Franz sighed. If cowardice wasn't a capital offence, he'd have long since legged it. Holding this position would be difficult to say the least, but if those were the orders then they would be carried out. He gave a series of commands, that laid out his force as follows. The fifty billhook men were put into two ranks of fifty, the front rank told to kneel so that a sort of quasi-phalanx would be made, whilst the crossbowmen and greatswordsmen were split into two equal groups of thirty and twenty-five respectively. These groups were put parallel to each other but perpendicular to the line of billhooks so that either the enemy would be force to attack the two flanks raining heavy crossbow bolts only to have the ranks of billhooks charge with their long polearms thrust into the enemy's side, or they would attack the billhook lines and get bolts rained into their back with the constant threat of a counter-charge into their flanks by the greatswords guarding the crossbows. Finally, Franz himself stepped a little bit ahead of the line of billhooks placing himself as bait for the warlord of the greenskins and possible his right hand men. He knew they loved their skull trophies and he needed to make use of that fact. The beast looked like with one swipe it could send flying many men, and so he had to distract it long enough until it's forces were dead and then it could be beaten with weight of numbers. He flourished his sword, kissing the blade. Some writers like to say that it is the waiting that's the worst part of war. In fact that's very wrong. Franz knew from experience the waiting was the best part, the worst part was having giant blades and bludgeons laid upon you. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>\"Move! Move! Move!\" Franz hurried his men along, knowing that while order was important, he had to get everyone out of the way of body splattering rocks. He thanked the father above for having narrowly escaped many deaths, but he knew he couldn't relax just yet. He had for the sake of escaping stones given up a perfect position, and now he and his men weren't sitting ducks for artillery, instead now becoming prey for greenskin hunting. <br/></div>"}, "post-94661": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1579215519000", "message": "There was no rhyme or reason to who or where the greenskins focused their attack.  There was an intense and deafening sound as the horde crashed upon the Imperial phalanx.  If there was a falter anywhere on the lines it was quickly replenished with the combined efforts of the Empire's discipline and Franz' encouragement.  The line would hold, at least until the weight of orcish waves eroded its integrity.Lesser assaults targeted the crossbow-greatsword lines.  The Imperials were met with a weaker attack here, but numbers alone made up for that.  The orc warchief, intelligent for one of his kind, held back from the fray for the moment.  His intention was to hit the whole of the Imperial line, watch where the enemy was weakest, and then focus a major attack at that point.Some distance from the main assault, Count Elric had reached the mounted reserves and they were crossing the river and rallying in a secluded position.  It would still take a short while before the entire force could make it across, but Elric did his damnedest to hurry the operation along.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was no rhyme or reason to who or where the greenskins focused their attack.  There was an intense and deafening sound as the horde crashed upon the Imperial phalanx.  If there was a falter anywhere on the lines it was quickly replenished with the combined efforts of the Empire's discipline and Franz' encouragement.  The line would hold, at least until the weight of orcish waves eroded its integrity."}, "post-94769": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1579631591000", "message": "The green tide was truly a horrifying thing. You couldn't fight an ork like you would a normal man. Greenskins had no sense of self preservation, and thus you can't use any traditional techniques of the blade against them. There was no point through a feint, because an orc never tried to parry he simply hit you once, and twice, and thrice until either it succeeded or you were too tired to try and stop it. You had to somehow deflect its attack, and then manage one of your own in time before it tried to strike you again. Franz had many years of experience fighting greenskins but even now he couldn't get used to how it was to go up against one. As they seemed to charge straight for the phalanx he ran back to step behind them, not wanting to get in the way of the billhook formation impaling the charging foe. As expected the main force went straight for the largest clump of Imperials for ease of getting a fight, which highlighted at least one plus of fighting orcs; they were very predictable. The crossbowmen were allowed to fire some volleys unmolested until smaller yet equally savage attacks came at them. Franz's order for them to not deploy their pavises and instead keep them on their back was still in force. As such they simply had to sling their crossbows and run back as the greenskins came at them, leading the foe right into the bladed embrace of the greatswords counter-charging. They would swing wide cleaving all that they could in twain, but if they got too heavily outnumbered too fast and surrounded they would drop their two handed blades and pull out their rapiers along with a dagger, these weapons doing nasty things in close quarters when paired together. At the same time, the crossbowmen would again set up their lines and fire into the cracks left in the lines of battle.The leader of the horde not joining the fray was a mixed blessing. On the one hand it meant he didn't swing wide holes in the Imperial formation, but it meant he had something planned. Perhaps he was waiting for the Vessian troops to be exhausted and unable to fight back so that he could claim as many heads as possible for himself. It was an unnerving thought, especially given the way the battle was going. The Imperials were holding, but the Lieutenant-Colonel didn't know how long that would last. The greenskins dropped dead in great numbers but it seemed that for every one fallen several more took their place. Franz did his best to help his men running over to wherever the line broke and bringing down his heavy sword on the head of any greenskins that caused the break; if they wore a helmet he wouldn't cleave their skull in twain but it was enough to break or at the very least damage it with concussive force. But he knew it wasn't enough, and all hope now lay in the Elector coming to save the day. He knew there would be no running today, you can't run from greenskins. They're not really faster than humans, but they don't tire and eventually they'll sink their weapon in your back and laugh as they rip you apart.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The green tide was truly a horrifying thing. You couldn't fight an ork like you would a normal man. Greenskins had no sense of self preservation, and thus you can't use any traditional techniques of the blade against them. There was no point through a feint, because an orc never tried to parry he simply hit you once, and twice, and thrice until either it succeeded or you were too tired to try and stop it. You had to somehow deflect its attack, and then manage one of your own in time before it tried to strike you again. Franz had many years of experience fighting greenskins but even now he couldn't get used to how it was to go up against one. As they seemed to charge straight for the phalanx he ran back to step behind them, not wanting to get in the way of the billhook formation impaling the charging foe. As expected the main force went straight for the largest clump of Imperials for ease of getting a fight, which highlighted at least one plus of fighting orcs; they were very predictable. The crossbowmen were allowed to fire some volleys unmolested until smaller yet equally savage attacks came at them. Franz's order for them to not deploy their pavises and instead keep them on their back was still in force. As such they simply had to sling their crossbows and run back as the greenskins came at them, leading the foe right into the bladed embrace of the greatswords counter-charging. They would swing wide cleaving all that they could in twain, but if they got too heavily outnumbered too fast and surrounded they would drop their two handed blades and pull out their rapiers along with a dagger, these weapons doing nasty things in close quarters when paired together. At the same time, the crossbowmen would again set up their lines and fire into the cracks left in the lines of battle."}, "post-94851": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1579912125000", "message": "There was none better to hold the hill than Franz Junger.  His phalanx did its job, and it did it well.  They had braced and were holding their own against the tide's onslaught.  Franz himself was an inspiration - an encouragement - to the men.  They fought all the harder when he was in their midst.  The Berglanders counter-charged the greenskins on their accord and met ferocity with Imperial steel.  They could not cleave most of the greenskins in two as they could normal men, but they dealt death nonetheless.  Where the crossbowmen were able they plugged the holes with their piercing rounds.  It was a bloodbath, and should have ended in a massacre for the Imperials were it not for the efforts of their gallant Lieutenant Franz Junger.Hopes and fates wavered.And then, in the distance, the sound of a horn.  It was barely audible among the clanging cacophony, but the sound of an Imperial signal was like an angel's voice in the midst of a desperate battle.Imperial cavalrymen charged over the hills in full force.  Like an ocean wave during a hurricane they meant to sweep away the orkish flank.  Those greenskins who were yet to cross the river, but too preoccupied with the bloodshed ahead of them, would have little time to brace for impact by the time the cavalry hit home.  In any case, it stalled the momentum of the orkish attack.  At that moment the balance of forces was even, and only Franz' decision would tip the balance.Seeing his danger, the orkish chief roared loudly and ploughed through his own troops headlong into the center.  He hoped to break that segment of the line and kill as many of the Imperials as he could himself.An unrelenting stampede of hooves unleashed a terrible sound of carnage as steel pierced green hides and splintered wooden shields.  Lances were driven into the hearts of foes, swords drawn to split the heads of greenskins.  Yet even for their impetus and imminence of victory, the orks dragged the men from their very steeds and pulled them apart - even tearing through the steeds themselves.  But despite their ferocious nature the greenskin rear had been effectively flanked and divided, and all that was left was to slaughter the stragglers.Franz, who may have found himself as an anvil, could now see himself as a hammer: able to slam into the greenskins who were now trapped between them and the river.\"Sir!  Sir, are you okay?\"At the bottom of the hill, where the cavalry had started their charge, a glossy-eyed Count Elric pulled himself up from the hoof-studded mud and peeled open his eyes .  \"Wh... what's happening!?  What's going on!?\"\"The cavalry sir - they've charged the enemy!  Are you alright, sir, you must have fallen from your horse!\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was none better to hold the hill than Franz Junger.  His phalanx did its job, and it did it well.  They had braced and were holding their own against the tide's onslaught.  Franz himself was an inspiration - an encouragement - to the men.  They fought all the harder when he was in their midst.  The Berglanders counter-charged the greenskins on their accord and met ferocity with Imperial steel.  They could not cleave most of the greenskins in two as they could normal men, but they dealt death nonetheless.  Where the crossbowmen were able they plugged the holes with their piercing rounds.  It was a bloodbath, and should have ended in a massacre for the Imperials were it not for the efforts of their gallant Lieutenant Franz Junger."}, "post-94943": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1580157153000", "message": "It was a bloodbath. The billhooks held as long as they could, tearing apart flesh and piercing deep into bodies. But as more and more orcs piled into the fight it became harder and harder for them to continue on to properly keep in formation. From the sheer numbers of the foe pressing in some of the shafts of the billhooks even broke, or were forced aside by the enemy simply being too close for a polearm to be effective. Many of the troopers were forced to switch to their katzbalger swords, and following this they would not last very long; trying to fight a greenskin with but a shortsword is not a very wise thing to do. Franz felt himself getting tired, his whiskers stuck together in wet clumps while sweat rolled all over him.\u00a0But a grand cacophony announced the salvation of the Imperial Troopers: Berglander riders were charging into the fray! But two things happened at once that were not in fact to plan. The orc leader charged forward, no longer biding his time. At the same time, a few men noticed Count Elric fall off of his steed. Franz tried to shut up one of the soldiers about to blurt out what he had seen, but it was futile as one already shouted out that Elric had fallen. These two things happening so close to one another made men panic. Even Franz until now stalwart was somewhat dazed. The orc chieftain's great weapon knocked him over, his now deeply gashed breastplate barely saving his life at the expense of now making it hard to breathe. Down on the ground, he was face to face with another Imperial soldier who's soft blue eyes he could just make out through his sallet helmet. The boy couldn't have been more than seventeen, and now his head was separate from his body. Well, he wasn't suing his helmet anymore so Franz emptied it and put it on his own head with his previous helmet having flown away. The Lieutenant-Colonel looked about the battlefield, and he was not happy with what he was seeing. Men were stepping back, their will to fight all but broken. One trooper - the most cowardly of them all - was so frightened that he ran away. Franz aimed his pistol-crossbow at the soft spot between his gorget and helmet didn't protect his neck, before firing. It felt vile to kill one of his own men just for him being scared, but it had to be done. He knew the fellow by name, Nikkels Tolay if he remembered right, a man already with a family he now would never return to. But it was a sacrifice that had to be made to keep the rest of the soldiers in line, to insure there wasn't a mass route and that the rest of the men wouldn't be massacred in the back by the greenskins. \"I told you all \u2014 I told you, cowards will be shot!\" Franz cried, standing on his toes to make himself appear taller and more noticeable to all of the men while speaking.\u00a0The officer had bought time, but the greenskin leader was still cleaving through the Imperial ranks and something had to be done about it. Franz scurried aside to a patch of open ground, before screaming and raising his sword at the orc. \"Oi! You there, you overgrown toad, is that really all you got? Come here, I took the rest of your scum and I'll take you alone too. Come on then, get your feeble arse over here!\" It was a clear challenge, Franz hoping that the beast would take the bait of insult to its honour. He knew he probably couldn't beat it, but he could distract it long enough for the rest of the greenskins to be beaten and then it could simply become a porcupine of crossbow bolts.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was a bloodbath. The billhooks held as long as they could, tearing apart flesh and piercing deep into bodies. But as more and more orcs piled into the fight it became harder and harder for them to continue on to properly keep in formation. From the sheer numbers of the foe pressing in some of the shafts of the billhooks even broke, or were forced aside by the enemy simply being too close for a polearm to be effective. Many of the troopers were forced to switch to their katzbalger swords, and following this they would not last very long; trying to fight a greenskin with but a shortsword is not a very wise thing to do. Franz felt himself getting tired, his whiskers stuck together in wet clumps while sweat rolled all over him.\u00a0"}, "post-94951": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1580223375000", "message": "Elric's attendant did not hesitate to hop down from his steed and quickly pull the commander to his feet.  As if that was hard enough, he struggled to lift the man high enough that he could wedge a oot into the horse's stirrup.  Finally, after some difficulty, the unhealthy Count of Bergland was back in his saddle.  \"Now hold on tight!\" the attendant urged, re-mounting his own steed.  \"Let's get back into the fight before the men lose heart!\"Elric was still half-dazed.  He was in condition to ride a horse, much less fight in the battle.  But presence is all.  He galloped as gallantly as he could to the rear of the cavalrymen.Most of the horsemen had did their work, disorganizing, dividing, and slaughtering the orks at the foot of the river.  Some of them had even crossed the water to hit the greenskins on that side, providing some relief to their brethren who were defending the hill.The warchief was smart enough not to react to insults, but clever enough that he knew taking out the commander would be a huge loss to morale for the enemy.  For the latter reason he swung his mighty axe above his head and came charging towards Franz - intending to cut him in two with one fell swipe.  Franz' men were terrified of the great behemoth's presence, and though some of them shuffled back in fear, they were nonetheless prepared to assist their stalwart commander should he need it.The momentum of the green tide had stalled, and was now reversing.  Push of pike and greatsword cleaving would be enough to sandwich the greenskins between the infantry and cavalry.Only butcher's work was left.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Elric's attendant did not hesitate to hop down from his steed and quickly pull the commander to his feet.  As if that was hard enough, he struggled to lift the man high enough that he could wedge a oot into the horse's stirrup.  Finally, after some difficulty, the unhealthy Count of Bergland was back in his saddle.  \"Now hold on tight!\" the attendant urged, re-mounting his own steed.  \"Let's get back into the fight before the men lose heart!\""}, "post-94971": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1580319024000", "message": "Elric went back on his horse, and instantly the men were of strong spirits. Now rather than fighting in self preservation the men of the Empire courageously raised blades and polearms to impale the foe and cleave it into pieces. Hands reloading crossbows no longer shook and they stayed steady when taking aim. Now the orcs were mere cattle to be slaughtered, heads separating from shoulders all across the battlefield; many trophies would be taken that day.\u00a0Of course the imminent victory was bittersweet. The men under Franz died in great number in spite of their resolve and many of the fallen were veterans and lesser officers. At the same time, the battle had been furious enough that the fresh faces under the Lieutenant Colonel's command would now leave veterans and indeed many would be receiving outright promotions. With that said, the fighting still wasn't over. Elric was joining the fray with the last of his men, but many orcs were still drawing breath, not to mention the one that was intent on taking Junger's head. Franz didn't so much dodge its monstrous swing as dive towards the ground right past it. He righted himself and then aimed a neck-high swing at the beast. Probably it would just be annoyed if it didn't manage to turn and parry in time, but it was still a distraction enough for the rest of the battle to finish up and the rest of the Imperials to come and stab or shoot the thing.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Elric went back on his horse, and instantly the men were of strong spirits. Now rather than fighting in self preservation the men of the Empire courageously raised blades and polearms to impale the foe and cleave it into pieces. Hands reloading crossbows no longer shook and they stayed steady when taking aim. Now the orcs were mere cattle to be slaughtered, heads separating from shoulders all across the battlefield; many trophies would be taken that day.\u00a0"}, "post-94972": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1580322098000", "message": "Franz' blade fought its mark.  It proved difficult to slice and then cleave through orkish flesh, but the Lieutenant manage to lacerate the great beast regardless.  Blood so dark it was almost black spurted profusely from the wound, painting Junger's armor as it did so.  But despite his fatal injury the beast managed to gurgle a roar and fought on.  Some of Franz' men, who could not bare to see their commander in such a situation, drove their pole-arms into the warchief's back and legs.  He raised his axe high above his head and in a last but futile attempt to bring it down on Franz' body, but instead collapsed forward, dead.\"Regroup!  Regroup!\"  Elric raised his sword and tried to circumnavigate the cavalry on his side of the river.  Some of the orks were making a mad dash for safety and his cavalrymen were attempting to cut them down.  But the Count wanted them back in the main action and did not want them to become separated from the main force to be picked off by concentrated bands of stragglers.But he was also concerned with the fact that some of his men attempted to encircle the foe completely; this would only make the situation more dire for the opponent, who would fight all the harder.  He wanted to leave a space for the greenskins to flee if they chose to do so; much better than to let them fight to the death and deal more casualties.But for the most part the greenskins were completed defeated.  The remainder were concurrently being stabbed and cut down by Franz' infantry.  When it became evident to the men a wave of euphoria erupted and they cried in triumph.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Franz' blade fought its mark.  It proved difficult to slice and then cleave through orkish flesh, but the Lieutenant manage to lacerate the great beast regardless.  Blood so dark it was almost black spurted profusely from the wound, painting Junger's armor as it did so.  But despite his fatal injury the beast managed to gurgle a roar and fought on.  Some of Franz' men, who could not bare to see their commander in such a situation, drove their pole-arms into the warchief's back and legs.  He raised his axe high above his head and in a last but futile attempt to bring it down on Franz' body, but instead collapsed forward, dead."}, "post-94995": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1580412152000", "message": "An almost hysteric laughter came from Franz as his strike indeed hit flesh. It was a gamble, but it was a gamble that had paid off. It was still alive though, even if some of the billhookmen ran forth to stab the beast. Franz prepared to parry, but it wasn't necessary as the last strength of the orcoid fled its body. It fell down, and the State Troopers returned back to their lines. Franz wasn't so hasty though, crouching over the great orc chief. He brought his sword down on its neck once, twice, thrice and then yet another time until finally the head was separated from the rest of the body. Then he plunged the tip of his blade into it's throat, surprised at the weight of the thing. With that done he rushed back to the lines, standing on a small mound of corpses to make sure he was higher and so that all people in the battlefield both friend and foe could see him. The Lieutenant-Colonel raised the sword with the impale orc chief's head up high in one hand, while the other was raised in a triumphant fist. The man roared in the heroic pose he struck, making sure all saw that the orc chief was dead. Then the previously fisted hand pointed in the direction of the remaining greenskins and Franz spoke once more. \"Forwards! For Emperor and Imperium!\" With that, he left the battle to play out however it would. He didn't really care if some orcs escape, or if alternatively they were decimated to the last. What mattered was that victory was in the hands of the Empire and that both he and the elector were alive. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "<div>An almost hysteric laughter came from Franz as his strike indeed hit flesh. It was a gamble, but it was a gamble that had paid off. It was still alive though, even if some of the billhookmen ran forth to stab the beast. Franz prepared to parry, but it wasn't necessary as the last strength of the orcoid fled its body. It fell down, and the State Troopers returned back to their lines. Franz wasn't so hasty though, crouching over the great orc chief. He brought his sword down on its neck once, twice, thrice and then yet another time until finally the head was separated from the rest of the body. Then he plunged the tip of his blade into it's throat, surprised at the weight of the thing. <br/></div>"}, "post-95002": {"user": "Count Elric of Bergland", "user_num": 3436, "timestamp": "1580428938000", "message": "The battle had effectively ended.  The Imperials talked the fields looking for their wounded before tending to the deceased; some among them looted what valuables the orks might have been carrying.  Those orcs which remained were lying broken on the field of battle, to be brutally executed by the perusing Imperials.Elric surveyed his side of the battle, where mangled horsemen, broken cavalrymen, and trampled orks were strewn across a hoof-trodden riverside.  His aides had taken to putting down the lame horses and securing the wounded, and so the Count crossed the shallows and made his way to the hill.He navigated his way through corpses of friends and foes alike until he finally came upon Franz Junger.  There before the Lieutenant lay the black-blooded warchief.  The smell alone caused Elric to grimace.  It was so impressively large.  He followed a trail of blood that ended at the beast's dismembered head, still in Franz' possession.\"Franz,\" he began, \"I am... at a loss of words.\"  He looked around to see the aftermath of the carnage on the hill.  \"It was one thing to hold this hill... but this-\" he raised his sword and pointed at the chief's body \"is a great feat in itself.\"  The Count turned his head back to the Lieutenant and smiled \"the Empire is made great because of men like you.  The Bergland will remember this day, mark my words.  And your deeds will not be unheard of in the Imperial Diet.  I will see to it that you - and all of the men here - are properly rewarded for their valor and courage.\"It was easy to talk of valor and courage, the Count thought, when you were still breathing.  What did the dead think?  More than that - what did the wounded think?  A number of the men suffered injuries or would lose limbs that would them lame for life.In any event, the Imperials had done their work and were now clearing the field of battle of their dead and wounded.  They would prepare to move out as soon as everyone was ready.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The battle had effectively ended.  The Imperials talked the fields looking for their wounded before tending to the deceased; some among them looted what valuables the orks might have been carrying.  Those orcs which remained were lying broken on the field of battle, to be brutally executed by the perusing Imperials."}, "post-95026": {"user": "Franz Junger", "user_num": 3584, "timestamp": "1580501324000", "message": "After the battle Franz simply sat down on the corpse of another orc looking over the dead chieftain and simply surveying the aftermath of the battle. So many years a soldier, and yet there was nowt a hope of getting used to this madness. He'd lived through Emperor Wladimir and Alexander as well as the interim between them, and yet... the stench of blood and the fear of getting your head cut off was just not something you could stomach.\u00a0When the Elector approached him he didn't instantly process him what with being in a mental world of his own. However once conscious of what had happened he rose to salute the man before bowing to him. He couldn't even fathom what to say, so he want for the classic mantra: \"I live to serve, Lord, and it is an honour to receive your praise.\" when Elric said that he would report what he had done in the Imperial Diet the Officer couldn't help but choke on his own spit. \"Th-thank you, Lord, I am forever in your debt!\" he managed. The attention of all Imperial leaders would be on him, a thought that sent cold sweat down his spine. But then again... why not? Perhaps this was what he needed to finally receive the notoriety he needed to gain a promotion to the real big cheese. Maybe he could live to see the rank of general, maybe he could even be made a Castellan!Well, it was all idle dreaming that there was no time for. There would be no celebration following this, instead the bodies were simply brought back and put into carts before being sent off to a warehouse from where they would be frozen and one by one sent off to the families of the fallen. For himself, Franz rallied the still living men and went on a long march back to the garrison he was previously assigned to. Likely all he'd get for this would in the end be a medal, though a bit of dreaming never hurt.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "After the battle Franz simply sat down on the corpse of another orc looking over the dead chieftain and simply surveying the aftermath of the battle. So many years a soldier, and yet there was nowt a hope of getting used to this madness. He'd lived through Emperor Wladimir and Alexander as well as the interim between them, and yet... the stench of blood and the fear of getting your head cut off was just not something you could stomach.\u00a0"}}